South Dakota, session 2026, SB238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 43-32:
A hotel, campground, or RV park may eject an individual from the premises if the
individual fails to check out of the accommodation or fails to pay for the accommodation
by the scheduled check-out time.
Prior to ejecting an individual from the premises, the hotel, campground, or RV
park shall, by electronic mail, text message, or printed paper, request the individual depart
from the premises. If an individual fails to depart from the premises within twenty-four
hours of receiving the request, the hotel, campground, or RV park may request a law
enforcement officer to remove the individual from the premises.
An individual who refuses to depart from premises within twenty-four hours after
receiving the request after failing to check out of the accommodation or failing to pay for
the accommodation by the scheduled check-out time, in accordance with this section, is
guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.
An individual wrongly ejected from an establishment premises may bring a civil
action for equitable relief, damages sustained, and reasonable attorney's fees.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.